Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.541

Liability to other persons of person dissociated as general partner.

(1) A person's dissociation as a general partner does not of itself discharge the person's liability as a general partner for an obligation of the limited partnership incurred before dissociation. Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the person is not liable for a limited partnership's obligation incurred after dissociation.

(2) A person whose dissociation as a general partner resulted in a dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership's activities is liable to the same extent as a general partner under RCW 25.10.401 on an obligation incurred by the limited partnership under RCW 25.10.586.

(3) A person that has dissociated as a general partner but whose

dissociation did not result in a dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership's activities is liable on a transaction entered into by the limited partnership after the dissociation only if:

(a) A general partner would be liable on the transaction; and

(b) At the time the other party enters into the transaction:

(i) Less than two years have passed since the dissociation; and

(ii) The other party does not have notice of the dissociation and reasonably believes that the person is a general partner.

(4) By agreement with a creditor of a limited partnership and the limited partnership, a person dissociated as a general partner may be released from liability for an obligation of the limited partnership.

(5) A person dissociated as a general partner is released from liability for an obligation of the limited partnership if the limited partnership's creditor, with notice of the person's dissociation as a general partner but without the person's consent, agrees to a material alteration in the nature or time of payment of the obligation.

[ 2009 c 188 s 607.]